Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.015

Classification as resident or nonresident student—Rules.

The student achievement council, with the advice of the attorney general, shall adopt rules to be used by the state's institutions for determining a student's resident and nonresident status and for recovery of fees for improper classification of residency.

[ 2012 c 229 s 523; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 150; 1985 c 370 s 64; 1982 1st ex.s. c 37 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Effective date—Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 37: See notes following RCW 28B.15.012.